Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
General Provisions
§ 81-5-37.
Uniform Common Trust Fund Law.

Any bank or trust company qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state may establish common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary, or to itself and others, as co-fiduciaries; and may, as such fiduciary or co-fiduciary, invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in such common trust funds, if such investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating such fiduciary relationship, and if, in the case of co-fiduciaries, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its co-fiduciary or co-fiduciaries to such investment.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction the bank or trust company operating such common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to such funds; but it may, by application to the chancery court, secure approval of such an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

This section shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate the general purpose of making uniform the law of those states which enact the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act.

This section may be cited as the Uniform Common Trust Fund Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5198.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 328, §§ 1-7.

§ 81-5-39.
Banks may register securities held in fiduciary capacity in name of bank’s nominee.

Whenever any bank or trust company organized under the laws of this state or any national bank doing business in this state is acting as trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, or other fiduciary and has a nominee, whether an individual, a corporation or a partnership, in whose name stocks, bonds, debentures, or any other corporate securities in registered form, may be registered, it shall be lawful and any such fiduciary is hereby authorized to register any such securities in the name of such nominee without disclosure of the trust or other fiduciary relationship on the face of the instrument evidencing such securities or in the bond registry or on the books of the corporation issuing the same, provided that:

the books and records kept by the fiduciary and the accounts rendered by it shall clearly reflect the ownership of such securities by the fiduciary,

the securities registered in the name of the nominee shall at all times be retained in the possession of the fiduciary and the nominee shall have no access thereto except under the immediate supervision of the fiduciary, and

the fiduciary shall be personally liable for any loss to the trust or estate resulting from any act or neglect of such nominee with respect to any securities registered in the name of the nominee.

Whenever any such bank or trust company is acting jointly with others as trustee or executor of a trust or estate it shall be lawful by agreement with such other fiduciary to register the securities of such trust or estate in the name of such bank or trust company’s nominee; and in the event two such banks or trust companies shall be acting as co-fiduciaries it shall be lawful to register the securities of the trust or estate in the name of the nominee of either fiduciary or by agreement to register a proportionate part thereof in the name of the nominee of each fiduciary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5279.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 144, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 81-5-40.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 71, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 420, § 1]

§ 81-5-41.
Foreign investors may engage in certain activities without qualifying.

Without excluding other activities within this state, or activities outside this state involving taking security of real estate located in this state, which may not constitute transacting or engaging in business in this state, any of the following, not organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi and which has no place of business within this state: a mutual savings bank or mutual savings fund society, or any national banking association now or hereafter organized under the laws of the United States of America, or any bank or trust company now or hereafter incorporated or organized under the laws of any state of the United States of America (including the District of Columbia,) or any insurance company, or any corporation all the capital stock of which (except directors’ qualifying shares) is owned by one or more such mutual savings banks, mutual savings fund societies, national banking associations, banks, trust companies or insurance companies, engaged in making or investing in loans secured by real estate or lending on the security of real estate, shall not be considered to be transacting or engaging in business in this state, by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

The acquisition or making of loans, or participation or interests therein, secured by deeds of trust, mortgages or mortgage notes on real property situated in Mississippi pursuant to commitment agreements or arrangements made prior to or following the origination or creation of said loans;

The making directly or through or in participation with national or state banks having banking offices in this state or other Mississippi concerns engaged within this state in the business of making or servicing such loans, of loans secured by such mortgages or mortgage notes, or loans secured by assignments or pledges of obligations secured by such mortgages or mortgage notes;

The ownership, modification, renewals, extensions, transfers or foreclosure of such loans, mortgages or mortgage notes, or the acceptance of substitute or additional obligators thereon;

The maintenance of bank accounts in national or state banks having banking offices within this state in connection with the collection or servicing of such loans, mortgages or mortgage notes;

The maintenance of depository or pledge-holder agreements or arrangements with national or state banks having banking offices within this state in connection with the taking of assignments or pledges of such loans, mortgages or mortgage notes;

The making, collection and servicing of such loans, mortgages or mortgage notes directly or through a Mississippi concern engaged in the business within this state of servicing real estate loans;

The taking of deeds to the mortgaged property for a reasonable period of time either in lieu of foreclosure or for the purpose of transferring title either to the Federal Housing Administration or to the Veterans Administration as the insurer or guarantor;

The acquisition of title to real property for a reasonable period of time under foreclosure sale or from the owner in lieu of foreclosure;

The management, rental, maintenance and sale, or the operating, maintaining, renting or otherwise dealing with, selling or disposing of real property acquired under foreclosure sale or by agreement in lieu thereof;

The maintaining or defending of any actions or suits relating to such loans, deeds of trust, mortgages, mortgage notes, agreements or other arrangements or activities referred to herein or incidental thereto; and

The physical inspection and appraisal of real property in Mississippi as security for mortgage notes or mortgages and negotiations for such loans.

The acquisition or making of loans, or participations or interest therein, which are secured by mortgages or mortgage notes on real property located in this state and the doing of any or all the other acts or things with respect hereto enumerated in this section, by any such bank, trust company, or any other corporation when acting as fiduciary, trustee or agent of any trust, whether testamentary or inter vivos, including foundations and trusts established for the purpose of funding pension, profit-sharing or employee benefit plans, or by an endowed institution, foundation or eleemosynary corporation, or by any corporation chartered under the laws of another state as a group insurance and annuity association and engaged in the business of insurance, annuities, pensions and retirement plans for any group of persons, educational institutions and others, or by any corporation all the capital stock of which (except directors’ qualifying shares) is owned by one or more of the entities referred to above, shall likewise not be considered to be transacting or engaging in business in this state; and any such corporation, when so acting as fiduciary, trustee or agent, and any such trust, endowed institution, foundation, eleemosynary corporation or group insurance and annuity association shall be entitled to all the rights, privileges and exceptions set forth in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the benefits and application of this section to loans insured or guaranteed by the Federal Housing Administration, the Veterans Administration, or any other governmental agency or department, and the benefits of this section shall extend to and include, all loans or participations or interests therein, secured by mortgages or mortgage notes on real property situated in Mississippi, whether or not insured or guaranteed.

No such corporation, institution or entity coming under the provisions of this section, and confining its business operations in Mississippi within the limits herein provided, shall be required to qualify to do business in this state by filing its charter in the Office of the Secretary of State or to pay any tax or fee required to be paid by corporations under any law of this state. However, such exemption shall not include: (a) Ad valorem taxes assessed against any real or personal property which such corporation, institution or entity may own in the State of Mississippi; (b) Mississippi income, franchise and privilege tax which may result from the sale, ownership or control after acquisition of such property by foreclosure, or acquisition in lieu of foreclosure, either by virtue of the value of the specific piece of property so foreclosed or to which title is taken in lieu of foreclosure, or by virtue of the rental or other income realized from said property.

Any bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, pension fund, mutual savings fund society, mutual banking association, insurance company or any other type of organization defined in this section and investing funds in Mississippi may sue or be sued within this state in relation to such mortgages or deeds of trust on real properties, securities or debts and service of process may be performed by service upon any custodian or agent appointed within the state. If no such custodian or agent has been appointed, the Secretary of State shall be and he is hereby appointed and shall remain as the duly authorized agent of such organization upon whom such service of process may be had. In cases where such organization is sued, the venue of such action shall be in the county of the residence of the plaintiffs, or any of them, except where land is involved, in which case, venue shall be in the county in which the land, or any part of it, is located.

The Secretary of State, upon the receipt of process by him on such organization, shall forthwith forward notice of the same by registered mail with return receipt requested to the post office address of such nonresident corporation, mutual savings bank or association and shall make a notation of said fact upon his process record to such effect.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any corporation to do business in violation of the Small Loan Law of the State of Mississippi nor of the laws of Mississippi governing the organization and operation of building and loan associations or societies, or savings and loan associations or societies, nor to limit the authority of corporations authorized to do unlimited business under the general laws of Mississippi, or to qualify to be so authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5287.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 163, §§ 1-3 [¶¶ 1-3]; Laws, 1968, ch. 254, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 514, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 46, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).

§ 81-5-43.
Out-of-state banking and trust associations and corporations may act as executors, administrators, trustees and guardians.

Any out-of-state banking corporation, or banking association, or out-of-state trust corporation, or association, which has its principal office in another state, authorized to act as executor or administrator of estates of decedents or trustees under wills and voluntary trust agreements, and as guardian of minors or incompetent persons, in the state where it has its principal office, may apply and act in such capacities in this state in ancillary or original proceedings, if similar domestic corporations or associations having their principal office in this state, which are authorized in this state to so act, are permitted to act in like capacity with no greater responsibilities or requirements in the state where such out-of-state corporation or association has its principal office.

No such corporation or association shall act in any such capacities until it shall have appointed in writing the Secretary of State of Mississippi, and his successor, as its service agent, upon whom all process in any suit or proceeding against it may be served, and in such writing shall agree that any process against it which shall be served upon such Secretary of State shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on such corporation or association. Such appointment shall continue so long as any liability shall remain outstanding against the corporation or banking association pertaining to any such matters.

The court having jurisdiction shall require such corporation or association to give bond for the performance of such trust, unless otherwise provided in the trust agreement or will, in which case the provisions of the statutes in such cases made and provided shall apply. However, no such corporation or association shall be required to give any bond for the performance of such trust where such corporation or association is not required to give bond for the performance of such trust under or by virtue of the laws of the state in which such corporation or association has its principal office.

This section shall not prevent out-of-state banking corporations or banking associations or out-of-state trust corporations or associations from qualifying and acting in a fiduciary capacity in the State of Mississippi under wills or trust agreements heretofore executed, designating such out-of-state corporation or association as a fiduciary thereunder, nor shall this section prevent any such out-of-state corporation or association that has heretofore qualified as a fiduciary in the State of Mississippi from continuing to serve as a fiduciary in matters in which they have heretofore qualified in this state. This section shall not apply to trust agreements executed for the purpose of securing loans or guaranties thereof.

For the purposes of this section, “out-of-state” means having the charter of incorporation issued by a state other than the State of Mississippi, or having its main office in a state other than the State of Mississippi; provided, however, this section shall not apply to an out-of-state national or state bank or out-of-state federal or state thrift which maintains a branch in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5198.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 145, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 174; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 47, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).

§ 81-5-45.
Qualification and oath of directors; meetings; executive and auditing committee.

Every director of every state bank must be the owner, in his or her own right, of unencumbered stock therein to the amount of at least Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) par value. He shall take and subscribe an annual oath that he will faithfully and diligently perform the duties of his office and will not knowingly violate or permit to be violated any provision of law. Such oath shall be immediately transmitted to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance and filed in its office. Every executive officer, as defined in Regulation O promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, of every bank doing business under the laws of this state shall subscribe to a similar annual oath and immediately transmit the same to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance. The board of directors of every banking corporation shall meet at least once each quarter in each calendar year and shall at such times consider generally the affairs of the bank. An executive and auditing committee selected by a majority of the board of directors shall meet at least in those months when the board of directors does not meet and shall at such times consider generally the affairs of the bank. However, if the board of directors of any bank meets every month, the executive and auditing committee of that bank shall meet at least two (2) times annually. The Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, in his discretion, may prescribe such forms as he may deem necessary, which, when properly executed, shall reflect the activities of the board of directors or the executive and auditing committee. It shall be the responsibility of the board of directors and the executive and auditing committee at such meetings to complete the forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, and to file same in its office when required by the commissioner.

The results of the examinations by the board of directors and the executive and auditing committee shall be entered in the minutes of the bank.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5199; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1964, ch. 223; Laws, 1994, ch. 320, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1997).

§ 81-5-47.
Directors may contract to sell stock while continuing to serve.

Any director of a bank or other banking corporation while serving in such capacity may enter into a contract or option providing for the sale of his or her stock at such time as he or she ceases, by death or otherwise, to be a director thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5199.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 256, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 26, 1966).

§ 81-5-49.
Interlocking directorates prohibited.

No person shall be permitted to be a director in more than one bank serving the same incorporated town or city doing business in this state. Any person holding a directorship in violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than $100.00 and be ineligible to hold a directorship in any state bank within two years therefrom. This section shall not apply to savings banks and trust companies operated in connection with commercial banks doing business in the same building.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5200; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-51.
Loans to directors and executive officers.

Loans aggregating fifteen percent (15%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus may be made by any state bank to any director or executive officer thereof, as defined in Regulation O promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, less existing direct and indirect liabilities thereto, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, provided, such loan is made on substantially the same terms and conditions extended to other borrowers for comparable transactions. Any state bank may lend to any such director or executive officer thereof, upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, not more than twenty percent (20%) of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of the bank, less the amount of existing direct and indirect liabilities, when secured; or when the portion thereof in excess of any amount loaned under the first provision hereof is secured by obligations of the United States government, the State of Mississippi, and the levee districts, counties, road districts, school districts, and municipalities of the State of Mississippi, obligations of any other state of the United States and other bonds of recognized character and standing, which are the subject of daily newspaper market quotations, provided such loan shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market or par value (whichever is less) of the bonds or obligations offered as security. Any state bank may lend to any executive officer or director thereof upon affirmative approval of a majority of all directors spread on the minutes of a directors’ meeting held before such loan is made, such amount as is safe and proper, when secured by warehouse receipts or shippers’ order bills of lading representing actual existing values, provided the amount loaned shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the market value of the commodities representing the actual existing values, and loans of this nature shall be made payable on demand so that the security held therefor may be sold on any date and the proceeds thereof applied to the payment of the loan. However, a bank’s board of directors may, as shown in its minutes, give to a bank officer the authority to make secured or unsecured loans to an executive officer or director of such bank, without receiving the board’s prior approval, in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, does not exceed the greater of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or five percent (5%) of the bank’s unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus. However, no state bank shall extend credit to any director or executive officer thereof, in an amount that, when aggregated with all other extensions of credit to that person and to all related interests of that person, exceeds Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) without documented prior affirmative approval of a majority of its directors.

Loans and discounts by a state bank to a director or executive officer thereof secured in full by funds on deposit in time or savings accounts with the lending bank to the credit of the borrower shall not be restricted to the fifteen percent (15%) or twenty percent (20%) limitations herein prescribed.

The limitations of this section shall not apply where an executive officer or director shall bona fide purchase from the bank at a reasonable price real or personal property acquired by the bank in payment of debts due the bank, provided such transactions are approved by a majority of the board of directors, such approval to be shown in their minutes; and, in cases where loans are made by branch banks, the sum total of loans made by any branch or branches and its parent bank to such executive officer or director shall be computed as against the total capital stock and surplus of the parent bank and its branch or branches. Loans heretofore made to executive officers or directors may be renewed or extended if in accord with sound banking practice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5201; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1936, ch. 165; Laws, 1966, ch. 249, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 342, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 308, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1996).

§ 81-5-53.
Limitation of liability when dealing with agents, trustees, etc.

A bank dealing, whether to its own benefit or otherwise, with, through or under any person, who is or may be an agent, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, or other fiduciary, or a corporate officer, agent or employee, or a partnership member or representative, shall not be deemed to have notice of or be obligated to inquire as to any lack of or limitation upon the power of such person by reason in and of itself, either of the fact that such person has executed in his representative capacity and is himself the payee or indorsee of any check, bill, note or other promise or order, or of the use of descriptive words in connection with his deposit account or accounts, or in connection with any transfer, certificate or memorandum thereof, or in connection with any signature or indorsement of such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5202; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-55.
Name of depositors not to be disclosed.

In no instance shall the name of any depositor, or the amount of his deposit, be disclosed to anyone, except to report to approved parties, such as credit bureaus, account verification services and others, the forcible closure of a deposit account due to misuse, such as fraud, kiting or chronic bad check writing or when required to be done in legal proceedings, for verification of public assistance in cases in which the Department of Human Services or the Division of Medicaid certifies that it has on file an effective written authorization from the depositor authorizing the disclosure of that information, for verification of the financial exploitation of a vulnerable person in cases in which the Attorney General submits a written authorization, or in case of insolvency of banks. The parties referred to in this section must be approved by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance and must satisfactorily demonstrate their reliability and credibility of their activities. Disclosure of depositor information to any affiliate or agent providing services on behalf of the bank shall not be considered disclosure of depositor information within the meaning of this section. The term “affiliate” means a corporation or business entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the bank. The term “agent” means anyone who has an agreement, arrangement or understanding to transact business for the bank by the authority and on account of the bank, provided that the agreement binds the agent to the same degree of confidentiality of disclosure of bank records as the bank. Any violation of this provision shall be considered a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, in any court of competent jurisdiction, the person shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both, and in addition thereto, shall be liable upon his bond to any person damaged thereby.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the disclosure to the State Treasurer, State Auditor, Legislative Budget Office, Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review or the Department of Finance and Administration, of any information about any type of account or investment, including certificates of deposit, owned by any public entity of the State of Mississippi.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit, or to impose liability for, the disclosure of information to:

The Department of Human Services, the Child Support Unit of the Department of Human Services, the Division of Medicaid, or their contractors or agents, pursuant to Chapter 13 or Chapter 19, Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

The Department of Revenue pursuant to Chapter 13, Title 85.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5279; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1984, ch. 327; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 32; Laws, 1987, ch. 326, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 542, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 146; Laws, 2001, ch. 603, § 13, Laws 2012, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 407, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 81-5-56.
Month and year checking account opened to be printed on face of checks.

From and after July 1, 1991, any financial institution offering checking accounts which accepts a new checking account shall require that there be printed on the face of each check for such new account the month and year in which the holder of the checking account first opened such account. Any account five (5) years of age or older may show an opening date of January 1986 if the date of actual opening is unavailable. The provisions of this section shall also apply to any additional checks ordered after July 1, 1991, for checking accounts which were in existence on March 15, 1991.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 399 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 81-5-57.
Excess deposits; limit and penalty.

No state bank shall receive and hold deposits continuously for more than twelve months in excess of twenty times its paid up capital, surplus, undivided profits and reserves, except by permission of the state comptroller. Such permission of the state comptroller shall be in writing executed in duplicate, and one copy thereof shall be delivered to and held by the bank and the other shall be kept on file in the office of the state comptroller. Any bank violating the provisions of this section shall be liable for $100.00 penalty for each day in which deposits are held contrary to the provisions hereof, payable upon demand by the state comptroller who shall bring suit therefor if not paid within ten days after demand. All penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the department of bank supervision maintenance fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5203; Laws, 1934, ch. 146; Laws, 1940, ch. 203; Laws, 1942, ch. 263; Laws, 1944, ch. 255, § 1.

§ 81-5-59.
Deposit of minors.

When any minor or other person under disability shall make a deposit in any bank in his or her name such bank may pay such money on a check or order of such person, the same as in other cases, and such payment shall be in all respects valid in law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5204; Laws, 1934, ch. 146.

§ 81-5-61.
Safe deposit boxes; leasing to minors.

Any bank or other corporation maintaining safe deposit boxes for lease to the public may lease one or more of such boxes to a minor eighteen (18) years of age or older and in connection therewith deal with such minor with the same effect as if leasing to and dealing with a person of full capacity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5204.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 255, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).

§ 81-5-62.
Accounts payable at death.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020]

Accounts payable at death may be established under the following conditions:

An account in a bank, including a national bank, may be opened by any person or persons with directions to make such an account payable on the death of the person or persons opening such an account to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries. When an account is so opened, the bank shall pay any monies to the credit of the account from time to time to, or pursuant to the order of, the person or persons opening such an account during his or their lifetime in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name or names of such person or persons. The term “accounts” or “account” as used in this section shall include, but not be limited to, any form of deposit or account, such as a savings account, checking account, time deposit, demand deposit or certificate of deposit, whether negotiable, nonnegotiable or otherwise.

If the named beneficiary or one (1) of the beneficiaries so named is an individual beneficiary and the individual beneficiary or beneficiaries survive the death of the person opening such an account, and the individual beneficiary or all of the individual beneficiaries so named are sixteen (16) years of age or over at the death of the person opening such an account, the bank shall pay the monies to the credit of the account, less all setoffs and charges, to the named individual beneficiary or beneficiaries or upon his or their order, as hereinafter provided, and such payment by the bank shall be valid, notwithstanding any lack of legal age of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries; provided, however, where such an account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the death of one (1) of such persons shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving person or persons and the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of paragraphs (c) through (j) of this section. For purposes of this section, the term “individual beneficiary” shall refer to a living person who is the named beneficiary of a payable on death account.

If the named individual beneficiary or all of the individual beneficiaries so named survive the death of the person or persons opening such an account and are under sixteen (16) years of age at such time, the bank shall pay the monies to the credit of the account, less all setoffs and charges:

When or after the named individual beneficiary becomes sixteen (16) years of age, to the named beneficiary or upon his order; or

When more than one (1) individual beneficiary is named, the bank shall pay to each individual beneficiary so named his proportionate interest in such account as each severally becomes sixteen (16) years of age; or

To the legal guardian of the named individual beneficiary, wherever appointed and qualified, or where more than one (1) beneficiary is named, the bank shall pay such individual beneficiary’s proportionate interest in such account to his legal guardian wherever and whenever appointed and qualified; or

If no guardian is appointed and qualified, payment may be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 93-20-209 or 93-20-431 in situations to which such section or sections are applicable.

Where the death of the person or persons opening such an account terminates the account under the provisions of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section, and where one or more of the named individual beneficiaries are under sixteen (16) years of age and the remainder of the named individual beneficiaries are sixteen (16) years of age or over, the bank shall pay the monies, less all setoffs and charges, to:

The named individual beneficiaries sixteen (16) years of age or over at the time of termination of such account pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section; and

The named individual beneficiaries under sixteen (16) years of age at the time of termination of such account pursuant to paragraph (c) of this section.

If the named beneficiary or one (1) of the beneficiaries so named is a revocable trust, evidenced by a written trust agreement, which trust is still in existence at the death of the person opening such an account, the bank shall pay the monies to the credit of the account, less all setoffs and charges, to the trustee of the named revocable trust or upon his or their order, as hereinafter provided, upon being presented an affidavit by the trustee stating that the name of the trust, the names of the current trustees, and that the trust is still in existence at the time of presentment of the affidavit. Such payment by the bank shall be valid, notwithstanding any lack of actual authority by the trustee, and the bank shall be discharged and released to the same extent as if the bank had dealt with the personal representative of the decedent. Such bank shall not be required to see to the proper application of the monies or evidence thereof or to inquire into the truth of any statement presented in the affidavit by the trustee.

Where such account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the bank, in the absence of any written instructions to the contrary which are consented to by the bank, shall accept payments made to such account and may pay any monies to the credit of such account from time to time to, or pursuant to the order of, either or any of such persons during their life or lives in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of either or any of such persons.

When a person or persons open an account in a bank in the form set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, and makes a payment or payments to such account or causes a payment or payments to be made to such account, it shall be conclusively presumed that such person or persons intend to vest in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries a present beneficial interest in such payment so made and in the monies to the credit of the account from time to time, to the end that, if the named beneficiary or beneficiaries survive the person or persons opening such an account, all the right and title of the person or persons opening such an account in and to the monies to the credit of the account at the death of such person or persons, less all setoffs and charges, shall, at such death, vest solely and indefeasibly in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the conditions and limitations of paragraphs (b) through (j) of this section.

If the named individual beneficiary predeceases the person opening such an account, or if the named beneficiary is a revocable trust that is terminated, the present beneficial interest presumed to be vested in the named beneficiary pursuant to paragraph (g) of this section shall terminate at the death of the named individual beneficiary or upon the termination of the revocable trust named as a beneficiary. In such case, the personal representatives of the named individual beneficiary, the beneficiaries of the revocable trust, and all others claiming through or under the named beneficiary, shall have no right in or title to the monies to the credit of the account, and the bank shall pay such monies, less all setoffs and charges, to the person opening such an account or pursuant to his order in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of the person opening such an account; provided, however, where such an account names more than one (1) beneficiary, the death of one (1) of the individual beneficiaries or the termination of a revocable trust beneficiary so named shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of paragraphs (b) through (j) of this section.

A bank which makes any payment pursuant to paragraphs (b) through (h) of this section, prior to service upon the bank of an order of court restraining such payment, shall, to the extent of each payment so made, be released from all claims of the person or persons opening such an account, the named beneficiary or beneficiaries, their legal representatives, and all others claiming through or under them.

When an account is opened in a form described in paragraph (a) of this section, the right of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries to be vested with sole and indefeasible title to the monies to the credit of the account on the death of the person or persons opening such an account shall not be denied, abridged or in anyway affected because such right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the law of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 326, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 484, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 2020.